Alaska, session 34, SB188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 41.17.400(d) is repealed and reenacted to read: 05 (d) The Tanana Valley State Forest includes the state-owned or acquired land 06 and water lying within the following described parcels: 07 (1) Township 1 North, Range 2 East, Fairbanks Meridian 08 Sections 1 - 3 09 Section 9: Tract A and D, according to ASCS Plat 75-35, 10 Fairbanks Recording District 11 Sections 10 - 14 12 Section 15: NE1/4, NW1/4 NW1/4, S1/2 13 Section 16: Tract A and D according to ASCS Plat 75-35, 14 Fairbanks Recording District, excluding ASLS 80-105, Plat 01 81-156, Fairbanks Recording District 02 Section 22: N1/2, N1/2 SW1/4, N1/2 SE1/4 03 Section 23: N1/2 04 Section 24: E1/2, NW1/4 05 Section 25: that portion of the NE1/4 northerly of the ordinary 06 high water mark of the right bank of the Little Chena River, 07 excluding SW1/4 SW1/4 NE1/4; E1/2 NW1/4 SE1/4, SW1/4 08 NW1/4 SE1/4; 09 (2) Township 1 North, Range 3 East, Fairbanks Meridian 10 Section 1 11 Section 2: W1/2 NE1/2, NW1/4, N1/2 SW1/4, SE1/4 SE1/4 12 Sections 3 - 6 13 Section 7: Tracts A-D, E1/2, E1/2 NW1/4 according to ASCS 14 Plat 82-111, Fairbanks Recording District 15 Sections 8 - 9 16 Section 10: NW1/4 NE1/4, NW1/4, N1/2 SW1/4, SW1/4 17 SW1/4, SE1/4 SE1/4 18 Section 11: E1/2, S1/2 SW1/4 19 Sections 12 - 14 20 Section 15: E1/2, SW1/4 21 Section 16: W1/2 NE1/4, NW1/4, SW1/4, NW1/4 SE1/4 22 Section 17 23 Section 18: Tracts A-D, E1/2, E1/2 SW1/4, according to ASCS 24 Plat 82-111, Fairbanks Recording District 25 Sections 19 - 20 26 Section 21: NW1/4, N1/2 SW1/4, SW1/4 SW1/4 27 Section 29: N1/2 28 Section 30: excluding SE1/4; 29 (3) Township 1 North, Range 4 East, Fairbanks Meridian 30 Sections 1 - 12 31 Sections 16 - 18; 01 (4) Township 1 North, Range 5 East, Fairbanks Meridian 02 Sections 3 - 10 03 Sections 15 - 16; 04 (5) Township 1 North, Range 4 West, Fairbanks Meridian 05 Section 5: W1/2 06 Sections 6 - 11 07 Sections 15 - 24 08 Section 27 09 Section 28: NE1/4, NE1/4 SE1/4 10 Section 29: S1/2, W1/2 NW1/4 11 Section 30 12 Section 31: excluding ASLS 82-192, Plat 83-236, Fairbanks 13 Recording District 14 Section 32 15 Section 33: W1/2; 16 (6) Township 1 North, Range 5 West, Fairbanks Meridian 17 Sections 1 - 9 18 Section 10: excluding ASLS 74-8, Plat 78-111 Fairbanks 19 Recording District and ASLS 73-116, Plat 78-51 Fairbanks 20 Recording District 21 Section 11: excluding ASLS 73-116, Plat 78-51 Fairbanks 22 Recording District and ASLS 81-206, Plat 82-110 Fairbanks 23 Recording District 24 Section 12: excluding ASLS 73-24, Plat 79-201 Fairbanks 25 Recording District 26 Sections 13 - 24 27 Section 25: excluding ASLS 93-173, Plat 95-32 Fairbanks 28 Recording District and ASLS 94-6, Plat 95-49 Fairbanks 29 Recording District 30 Section 26: excluding ASLS 94-6, Plat 95-49, Fairbanks 31 Recording District 01 Sections 27 - 36; 02 (7) Township 1 North, Range 6 West, Fairbanks Meridian 03 Section 1 04 Section 12 05 Section 13: excluding USS 4466A 06 Section 24 07 Section 25: excluding USS 4473C 08 Section 35: excluding USS 9979 09 Section 36; 10 (8) Township 1 North, Range 8 West, Fairbanks Meridian 11 Section 17 12 Section 18: excluding USS 4152 13 Section 19: excluding USS 4152 14 Section 20: excluding USS 4455A and USS 4462C 15 Sections 29 - 33 16 Section 34: excluding USS 4356A and USS 4461A 17 Section 35: W1/2; 18 (9) Township 1 North, Range 9 West, Fairbanks Meridian 19 Section 13: excluding USS 4225A 20 Section 14: excluding USS 4225A and USS 4444C 21 Section 15: excluding USS 4442B 22 Sections 16 - 19 23 Section 20: excluding USS 4460B and USS 4467A 24 Section 21: excluding USS 4460B, USS 4467A, and USS 4169 25 Section 22: excluding USS 4442B and USS 4153B 26 Section 23: excluding USS 4153B and USS 4471 27 Section 24 - 25 28 Section 26: excluding USS 4471 29 Section 27: excluding USS 4444D 30 Section 28: excluding USS 4467A 31 Sections 29 - 34 01 Section 35: excluding USS 10031 02 Section 36; 03 (10) Township 1 North, Range 10 West, Fairbanks Meridian 04 Sections 13 - 36; 05 (11) Township 1 North, Range 11 West, Fairbanks Meridian 06 Sections 5 - 7 07 Section 18: north and west of the ordinary high water mark of 08 the right bank of the Tolovana River 09 Section 19: west of the ordinary high water mark of the right 10 bank of the Tolovana River 11 Section 30: south and west of the ordinary high water mark of 12 the right bank of the Tolovana River 13 Sections 31 - 36; 14 (12) Township 1 North, Range 12 West, Fairbanks Meridian 15 Sections 1 - 20 16 Section 21: excluding ASLS 80-2, Plat 82-1 Manley Hot 17 Springs Recording District 18 Sections 22 - 36; 19 (13) Township 1 North, Range 13 West, Fairbanks Meridian 20 Sections 1 - 3 21 Sections 10 - 15 22 Sections 22 - 26 23 Sections 35 - 36; 24 (14) Township 2 North, Range 2 East, Fairbanks Meridian 25 Sections 34 - 36; 26 (15) Township 2 North, Range 3 East, Fairbanks Meridian 27 Section 11: S1/2 28 Section 12: S1/2 29 Sections 13 - 16 30 Sections 21 - 24 31 Section 25: excluding USS 6690 01 Sections 26 - 29 02 Sections 31 - 35 03 Section 36: excluding USS 6690; 04 (16) Township 2 North, Range 4 East, Fairbanks Meridian 05 Sections 1 - 19 06 Section 20: NE1/4 07 Section 21: N1/2 08 Section 30: N1/2; 09 (17) Township 2 North, Range 5 East, Fairbanks Meridian 10 Section 3 11 Sections 5 - 12 12 Sections 15 - 22 13 Sections 27 - 34; 14 (18) Township 2 North, Range 6 East, Fairbanks Meridian 15 Sections 5 - 8; 16 (19) Township 2 North, Range 2 West, Fairbanks Meridian 17 Section 19: Tract B, ASLS 82-157, Plat 83-35, Fairbanks 18 Recording District; 19 (20) Township 2 North, Range 3 West, Fairbanks Meridian 20 Section 11: S1/2 21 Section 12: S1/2 22 Section 13: excluding ASLS 74-99, Plat 75-107 in Fairbanks 23 Recording District and ASLS 75-102, Plat 78-50 Fairbanks 24 Recording District 25 Sections 14 - 17 26 Sections 19 - 24; 27 (21) Township 2 North, Range 5 West, Fairbanks Meridian 28 Section 1: excluding ASLS 73-127, Plat 82-77; ASLS 76-73, 29 Plat 81-105; and ASLS 78-56, Plat 81-25, all Fairbanks 30 Recording District 31 Sections 2 - 9 01 Section 10: excluding ASLS 78-24, Plat 83-75, Fairbanks 02 Recording District 03 Sections 11 - 15 04 Section 16: excluding ASLS 76-25, Plat 77-206, Fairbanks 05 Recording District 06 Section 17: excluding ASLS 76-25, Plat 77-206; and ASLS 79- 07 91, Plat 83-16, Fairbanks Recording District 08 Section 18 09 Section 19: excluding ASLS 75-44, Plat 76-202; ASLS 75-124, 10 Plat 77-185; ASLS 77-4, Plat 79-95; ASLS 77-85, Plat 84-27; 11 ASLS 80-75, Plat 82-92; ASLS 81-89, Plat 81-116, all 12 Fairbanks Recording District 13 Section 20: excluding ASLS 75-44, Plat 76-202; ASLS 76-24, 14 Plat 77-205; ASLS 77-4, Plat 79-95; ASLS 80-90, Plat 83-17; 15 ASLS 81-84, Plat 82-87, all Fairbanks Recording District 16 Sections 21 - 28 17 Section 29: excluding ASLS 75-44, Plat 76-202; ASLS 76-212, 18 Plat 81-74; ASLS 77-4, Plat 79-95; ASLS 80-69, Plat 81-100; 19 ASLS 81-87, Plat 83-14, all Fairbanks Recording District 20 Section 30: excluding ASLS 76-58, Plat 80-154; ASLS 77-151, 21 Plat 80-43, all Fairbanks Recording District 22 Section 31: excluding ASLS 78-68, Plat 79-176, Fairbanks 23 Recording District 24 Sections 32 - 36; 25 (22) Township 2 North, Range 10 West, Fairbanks Meridian 26 Sections 4 - 6 27 Section 7: N1/2; 28 (23) Township 2 North, Range 11 West, Fairbanks Meridian 29 Sections 1 - 9 30 Section 10: N1/2 31 Section 11: N1/2 01 Section 12: N1/2 02 Sections 16 - 21 03 Sections 28 - 33; 04 (24) Township 2 North, Range 12 West, Fairbanks Meridian; 05 (25) Township 2 North, Range 13 West, Fairbanks Meridian 06 Sections 1 - 30 07 Sections 33 - 36; 08 (26) Township 2 North, Range 14 West, Fairbanks Meridian 09 Sections 23 - 26; 10 (27) Township 3 North, Range 2 East, Fairbanks Meridian 11 Section 12: E1/2 SE1/4 12 Section 13: NE1/4 NE1/4, S1/2 NE1/4, S1/2 NW1/4, S1/2 13 Section 14: S1/2, excluding USMS 1695; 14 (28) Township 3 North, Range 3 East, Fairbanks Meridian 15 Section 7: S1/2 16 Section 8: S1/2 17 Section 9: E1/2 NE1/4, S1/2 18 Section 10 19 Sections 14 - 17 20 Section 18: N1/2, SW1/4, N1/2 SE1/4 21 Section 20: N1/2 NE1/4 22 Section 21: N1/2, W1/2 SE1/4 23 Section 22: N1/2, N1/2 SW1/4, N1/2 SE1/4 24 Section 23 25 Section 26: E1/2 NW1/4, E1/2 SW1/4; 26 (29) Township 3 North, Range 4 East, Fairbanks Meridian 27 Section 1 28 Sections 10 - 15 29 Section 20: S1/2 30 Section 21: S1/2 31 Sections 22 - 28 01 Section 29: excluding USMS 2051 02 Sections 32 - 36; 03 (30) Township 3 North, Range 5 East, Fairbanks Meridian 04 Section 4 - 9 05 Section 10: S1/2 06 Section 11: S1/2 07 Section 12: S1/2 08 Section 13: N1/2 09 Section 16: W1/2 10 Sections 17 - 21 11 Section 22: S1/2 NW1/4, SW1/4 12 Section 27: N1/2 13 Section 28: N1/2 14 Section 29: N1/2, SW1/4 15 Sections 30 - 31; 16 (31) Township 3 North, Range 6 East, Fairbanks Meridian 17 Section 7: S1/2 18 Section 8: S1/2 19 Section 17: N1/2 20 Section 18: N1/2; 21 (32) Township 3 North, Range 2 West, Fairbanks Meridian 22 Section 7: Tract E, ASLS 81-20, Plat 82-124, Fairbanks 23 Recording District 24 Section 8: Tract H-1, ASLS 88-48, Plat 91-5, Fairbanks 25 Recording District; Tracts J and L, ASLS 81-20, Plat 82-124, 26 Fairbanks Recording District 27 Section 17: Tracts M, N, and O, ASLS 81-20, Plat 82-124, 28 Fairbanks Recording District 29 Section 18: Tracts A and B, ASLS 81-20, Plat 82-124, 30 Fairbanks Recording District 31 Sections 19 - 20 01 Section 29: N1/2, N1/2 SW1/4, N1/2 SE1/4; 02 (33) Township 3 North, Range 3 West, Fairbanks Meridian 03 Section 1: excluding ASLS 89-062, Plat 89-118, Fairbanks 04 Recording District 05 Section 2: excluding ASLS 80-086, Plat 83-098, Fairbanks 06 Recording District 07 Sections 3 - 24 08 Section 25: N1/2 09 Section 26: excluding ASLS 76-135, Plat 80-156, Fairbanks 10 Recording District 11 Sections 27 - 30 12 Section 31: N1/2, SW1/4 13 Section 32: N1/2 14 Section 33: N1/2 15 Section 34: N1/2 16 Section 35: N1/2, excluding ASLS 76-135, Plat 80-156, 17 Fairbanks Recording District; 18 (34) Township 3 North, Range 4 West, Fairbanks Meridian 19 Section 1 20 Section 2: N1/2 21 Section 3: west of the ordinary high water mark of the right 22 bank of Washington Creek 23 Sections 4 - 7 24 Section 8: west of the ordinary high water mark of the right 25 bank of Washington Creek 26 Section 9: west of the ordinary high water mark of the right 27 bank of Washington Creek 28 Sections 11 - 17 29 Section 18: excluding USS 4447B and ASLS 82-184, Plat 85- 30 252, Fairbanks Recording District 31 Section 19: excluding USS 4447B 01 Sections 20 - 36; 02 (35) Township 3 North, Range 5 West, Fairbanks Meridian 03 Section 1 04 Section 4: north of the ordinary high water mark of the right 05 bank of the Tatalina River 06 Section 5: NE1/4 NE1/4 north of the ordinary high water mark 07 of the right bank of the Tatalina River 08 Section 6: excluding E1/2 NE1/4 09 Section 7 10 Sections 11 - 13 11 Section 14: excluding S1/2 SW1/4 12 Sections 15 - 22 13 Section 23: excluding N1/2 NW1/4 14 Sections 24 - 36; 15 (36) Township 3 North, Range 6 West, Fairbanks Meridian 16 Sections 1 - 12; 17 (37) Township 3 North, Range 7 West, Fairbanks Meridian 18 Sections 1 - 3 19 Sections 10 - 12; 20 (38) Township 3 North, Range 10 West, Fairbanks Meridian 21 Sections 1 - 10 22 Sections 15 - 33; 23 (39) Township 3 North, Range 11 West, Fairbanks Meridian 24 Sections 1 - 3 25 Sections 10 - 16 26 Section 17: E1/2 NE1/4, SW1/4 NE1/4, S1/2 excluding ASLS 27 86-100, Plat 87-2, Manley Hot Springs Recording District 28 Section 18: S1/2 29 Section 19 30 Section 20: excluding ASLS 86-100, Plat 87-2, Manley Hot 31 Springs Recording District 01 Sections 21 - 36; 02 03 (40) Township 3 North, Range 12 West, Fairbanks Meridian 04 Section 1 05 Section 9: N1/2 06 Section 10: E1/2, NW1/4 07 Section 11: excluding ASLS 87-305, Plat 88-2, Manley Hot 08 Springs Recording District 09 Sections 12 - 14 10 Section 15: E1/2, SE1/4 NW1/4, SW1/4 11 Section 19: south and east of the ordinary high water mark of 12 the right bank of Hutlitakwa Creek 13 Section 20: south of the ordinary high water mark of the right 14 bank of Hutlitakwa Creek 15 Section 21: south of the ordinary high water mark of the right 16 bank of Hutlitakwa Creek 17 Sections 22 - 29 18 Section 30: south of the ordinary high water mark of the right 19 bank of Hutlitakwa Creek 20 Sections 31 - 36; 21 (41) Township 3 North, Range 13 West, Fairbanks Meridian 22 Section 3 23 Section 4: E1/2, S1/2 NW1/4, NE1/4 NW1/4, SW1/4 24 Section 9 25 Sections 16 - 17 26 Section 20 27 Section 21: W1/2 28 Section 25: south of the ordinary high water mark of the right 29 bank of Hutlitakwa Creek 30 Section 26: south and east of the ordinary high water mark of 31 the right bank of Hutlitakwa Creek 01 Section 29 02 Sections 31 - 32 03 Section 34: south and east of the ordinary high water mark of 04 the right bank of Hutlitakwa Creek 05 Section 35: south and east of the ordinary high water mark of 06 the right bank of Hutlitakwa Creek 07 Section 36; 08 (42) Township 3 North, Range 14 West, Fairbanks Meridian 09 Section 36; 10 (43) Township 4 North, Range 4 East, Fairbanks Meridian 11 Section 36; 12 (44) Township 4 North, Range 5 East, Fairbanks Meridian 13 Section 19: S1/2 14 Section 20: S1/2 15 Section 29: NE1/4, W1/2 16 Sections 30 - 31; 17 (45) Township 4 North, Range 3 West, Fairbanks Meridian 18 Section 9: SE1/4 19 Section 10: S1/2 west of the Alyeska Pipeline right of way 20 Section 11: SW1/4 west of the Alyeska Pipeline right of way 21 Section 13: SW1/4 west of the Alyeska Pipeline right of way 22 Section 14: N1/2 NW1/4 NW1/4 west of the Alyeska Pipeline 23 right of way, S1/2 SW1/4, SE1/4 south of the Alyeska Pipeline 24 right of way 25 Section 15 26 Section 16: E1/2 27 Section 21: NE1/4 28 Sections 22 - 23 29 Section 24: south of the Alyeska Pipeline right of way 30 Section 25 31 Section 26: E1/2, E1/2 NW1/4, E1/2 SW1/4 01 Section 31: Government Lots 3 and 4, E1/2 SW1/4, SE1/4 02 Section 32: S1/2 03 Section 33: E1/2, E1/2 NW1/4, SW1/4 04 Sections 34 - 36; 05 (46) Township 4 North, Range 5 West, Fairbanks Meridian 06 Section 1: west of the ordinary high water mark of the right 07 bank of Tatalina River 08 Sections 2 - 10 09 Section 11: west of the ordinary high water mark of the right 10 bank of Tatalina River 11 Section 12: west of the ordinary high water mark of the right 12 bank of Tatalina River 13 Section 14: west of the ordinary high water mark of the right 14 bank of Tatalina River 15 Section 15: north and west of the ordinary high water mark of 16 the right bank of Tatalina River 17 Sections 16 - 21 18 Section 22: north and west of the ordinary high water mark of 19 the right bank of Tatalina River 20 Section 27: west of the ordinary high water mark of the right 21 bank of Tatalina River 22 Section 28: north and west of the ordinary high water mark of 23 the right bank of Tatalina River 24 Sections 29 - 30 25 Section 31: excluding SE1/4 SE1/4 26 Section 32: excluding S1/2 SW1/4 27 Section 33: west of the ordinary high water mark of the right 28 bank of Tatalina River; 29 (47) Township 4 North, Range 6 West, Fairbanks Meridian 30 Section 1 31 Sections 10 - 15 01 Sections 22 - 36; 02 (48) Township 4 North, Range 7 West, Fairbanks Meridian 03 Sections 25 - 26 04 Section 32: SE 1/4 05 Sections 33 - 36; 06 (49) Township 4 North, Range 10 West, Fairbanks Meridian 07 Section 3: S1/2 08 Section 9: S1/2 09 Section 10 10 Section 15: N1/2, SW1/4, N1/2 SE1/4, SW1/4 SE1/4 11 Section 16 12 Section 17: S1/2 13 Section 18: S1/2 14 Sections 19 - 20 15 Section 21: N1/2, SW1/4, N1/2 SE1/4, SW1/4 SE1/4 16 Section 22: N1/2 NW1/4, SW1/4 NW1/4 17 Section 28: NW1/4 NW1/4 18 Section 29: N1/2, SW1/4, N1/2 SE1/4, SW1/4 SE1/4 19 Sections 30 - 31 20 Section 32: W1/2, SW1/4 SE1/4; 21 (50) Township 4 North, Range 13 West, Fairbanks Meridian 22 Section 21: excluding USS 5608 23 Section 22: excluding USS 4024 24 Section 23: excluding USS 4024 25 Section 24: north of the Elliott Highway right of way 26 Section 26: NW1/4 27 Section 27 28 Section 28: N1/2, SE1/4 29 Section 33: E1/2 30 Section 34; 31 (51) Township 5 North, Range 5 East, Fairbanks Meridian 01 Sections 1 - 5 02 Section 6: south of the White Mountains National Recreation 03 Area 04 Sections 7 - 8 05 Section 9: N1/2, SW1/4 excluding Tract 37 06 Section 10: N1/2 NE1/4, N1/2 NW1/4 07 Section 11: N1/2 NE1/4, N1/2 NW1/4, excluding USS 5598 08 Section 12: N1/2 NE1/4, N1/2 NW1/4, excluding USS 5598 09 Section 17: NW1/4 NE1/4, N1/2 NW1/4 10 Section 18: N1/2, SW1/4, NW1/4 SE1/4 11 Excluding the Davidson Ditch right of way; 12 (52) Township 5 North, Range 6 East, Fairbanks Meridian 13 Section 6: excluding SE1/4 SE1/4 14 (53) Township 5 North, Range 5 West, Fairbanks Meridian 15 Section 1: west and south of the ordinary high water mark of the 16 right bank of Slate Creek 17 Section 2: west and south of the ordinary high water mark of the 18 right bank of Slate Creek 19 Sections 3 - 5 20 Section 6: E1/2 21 Section 7: E1/2 22 Sections 8 - 10 23 Section 11: west and south of the ordinary high water mark of 24 the right bank of Slate Creek 25 Section 12: west and south of the ordinary high water mark of 26 the right bank of Slate Creek 27 Sections 13 - 17 28 Section 18: E1/2 29 Sections 19 - 36; 30 (54) Township 5 North, Range 6 West, Fairbanks Meridian 31 Section 5: W1/2 01 Section 7: excluding USS 5610A and Jack Wright Subdivision, 02 Plat 2018-39, Fairbanks Recording District 03 Section 8: NW1/4, excluding USS 5610A 04 Section 18: NW1/4 NE1/4, NW1/4, NE1/4 SW1/4, W1/2 05 SW1/4; 06 (55) Township 5 North, Range 7 West, Fairbanks Meridian 07 Section 13 08 Section 14: E1/2 09 Section 23: E1/2 10 Section 24: N1/2, SW1/4, NW1/4 SE1/4 11 Section 25: NW1/4 NW1/4 12 Section 26: N1/2, SW1/4, NW1/4 SE1/4 13 Section 35: NW1/4 NW1/4; 14 (56) Township 5 North, Range 8 West, Fairbanks Meridian 15 Section 4: W1/2 16 Section 5: E1/2, S1/2 NW1/4, SW1/4 17 Section 6: S1/2 SW1/4, SE1/4 18 Sections 7 - 8 19 Section 9: S1/2 NE1/4, W1/2, SE1/4 20 Section 10: S1/2 NW1/4, SW1/4 21 Sections 16 - 18; 22 (57) Township 5 North, Range 9 West, Fairbanks Meridian 23 Sections 12 - 13; 24 (58) Township 6 North, Range 5 East, Fairbanks Meridian 25 Section 13: south of the White Mountains National Recreation 26 Area 27 Section 23: south of the White Mountains National Recreation 28 Area 29 Section 24: south of the White Mountains National Recreation 30 Area 31 Section 25 01 Section 26: south of the White Mountains National Recreation 02 Area 03 Section 27: south of the White Mountains National Recreation 04 Area 05 Section 28: south of the White Mountains National Recreation 06 Area 07 Section 31: south of the White Mountains National Recreation 08 Area 09 Section 32: south of the White Mountains National Recreation 10 Area 11 Section 33: south of the White Mountains National Recreation 12 Area 13 Sections 34 - 36; 14 (59) Township 6 North, Range 6 East, Fairbanks Meridian 15 Section 18: south of the White Mountains National Recreation 16 Area 17 Section 19 18 Sections 30 - 31; 19 (60) Township 6 North, Range 4 West, Fairbanks Meridian 20 Section 5: west of Alyeska Pipeline right-of-way and west of 21 the ordinary high water mark of the left bank of Slate Creek 22 Section 6: west of Alyeska Pipeline right-of-way 23 Section 7: west of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 24 of Slate Creek 25 Section 8: west of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 26 of Slate Creek 27 Section 18: west of the ordinary high water mark of the left 28 bank of Slate Creek 29 Section 19: west of the ordinary high water mark of the left 30 bank of Slate Creek; 31 (61) Township 6 North, Range 5 West, Fairbanks Meridian 01 Sections 1 - 4 02 Section 5: E1/2 03 Section 8: E1/2 04 Sections 9 - 16 05 Section 17: E1/2 06 Sections 20 - 22 07 Section 23: west and north of the ordinary high water mark of 08 the left bank of Slate Creek 09 Section 24: west and north of the ordinary high water mark of 10 the left bank of Slate Creek 11 Section 26: west of the ordinary high water mark of the left 12 bank of Slate Creek 13 Section 27: west of the ordinary high water mark of the left 14 bank of Slate Creek 15 Sections 28 - 29 16 Sections 32 - 33 17 Section 34: west of the ordinary high water mark of the left 18 bank of Slate Creek 19 Section 35: west of the ordinary high water mark of the left 20 bank of Slate Creek; 21 (62) Township 6 North, Range 6 West, Fairbanks Meridian 22 Section 8: S1/2 23 Section 9: W1/2 NE1/4, W1/2, NW1/4 SE1/4 24 Section 16: NE1/4 NW1/4, W1/2 NW1/4, NW1/4 SW1/4 25 Sections 17 - 20 26 Section 29: W1/2 NE1/4, W1/2, W1/2 SE1/4 27 Sections 30 - 31 28 Section 32: Government Lots 1 and 2, NW1/4, N1/2 SW1/4; 29 (63) Township 6 North, Range 7 West, Fairbanks Meridian 30 Sections 25 - 26 31 Sections 35 - 36; 01 (64) Township 7 North, Range 4 West, Fairbanks Meridian 02 Section 30: west of Alyeska Pipeline right-of-way 03 Section 31: west of Alyeska Pipeline right-of-way; 04 (65) Township 7 North, Range 5 West, Fairbanks Meridian 05 Section 15: west of Alyeska Pipeline right-of-way 06 Section 16: E1/2 07 Section 21: E1/2 08 Section 22: west of Alyeska Pipeline right-of-way 09 Section 23: west of Alyeska Pipeline right-of-way 10 Section 25: south and west of Alyeska Pipeline right-of-way 11 Section 26: west of Alyeska Pipeline right-of-way 12 Section 27 13 Section 28: E1/2 14 Section 33: E1/2 15 Sections 34 - 36; 16 (66) Township 1 South, Range 3 East, Fairbanks Meridian 17 Section 1 18 Section 11: excluding ADL 400028 Chena River Lakes Flood 19 Control Project 20 Section 12: excluding ADL 400028 Chena River Lakes Flood 21 Control Project and those lands lying within the bed of the 22 Chena River 23 Section 13: E1/2 NE1/4, excluding Replat of Tract A, Riversong 24 Recreational Tracts, Plat 2008-102, Fairbanks Recording 25 District and USS 4083; E1/2 SE1/4; SW1/4 SE1/4, excluding 26 ADL 400028 Chena River Lakes Flood Control Project; 27 Section 14: excluding ADL 400028 Chena River Lakes Flood 28 Control Project and those lands lying within the bed of the 29 Chena River 30 Section 15: S1/2 NE1/4, S1/2 NW1/4, S1/2 31 Section 16 01 Section 24: N1/2, excluding ADL 400028 Chena River Lakes 02 Flood Control Project and those lands lying within the bed of 03 the Chena River; 04 (67) Township 1 South, Range 4 East, Fairbanks Meridian 05 Section 1 06 Section 2, excluding Lots 1, 2, and 4 of USS 4057 07 Section 4: S1/2 08 Section 5: S1/2, NW1/4 09 Sections 6 - 7 10 Section 8: north of the ordinary high water mark of the right 11 bank of the Chena River, excluding USS 8694 12 Section 9: N1/2 NE1/4, NW1/4 north of the ordinary high water 13 mark of the right bank of the Chena River 14 Section 10: NE1/4 15 Section 11 16 Section 12: N1/2 17 Section 17: north of the ordinary high water mark of the right 18 bank of the Chena River 19 Section 18; 20 (68) Township 1 South, Range 5 East, Fairbanks Meridian 21 Section 6: excluding USS 4324 22 (69) Township 1 South, Range 3 West, Fairbanks Meridian 23 Section 26: S1/2 south of the Parks Highway right of way 24 Section 27: south of the Parks Highway right of way 25 Section 28: south of the Parks Highway right of way 26 Section 29: south of the Parks Highway right of way 27 Section 31: south of the Parks Highway right of way 28 Section 32: south of the Parks Highway right of way 29 Section 33: south of the Parks Highway right of way 30 Section 34: south of the Parks Highway right of way 31 Section 35; 01 (70) Township 1 South, Range 4 West, Fairbanks Meridian 02 Section 4: W1/2 excluding ASLS 83-160, Plat 84-130, 03 Fairbanks Recording District 04 Section 5: excluding ASLS 86-183, Plat 88-27, Fairbanks 05 Recording District and 06 ASLS 90-194, Plat 91-37, Fairbanks Recording District 07 Section 6: excluding ASLS 93-011, Plat 94-67, Fairbanks 08 Recording District 09 Section 7 10 Section 8: SE1/4 11 Section 18: N1/2 12 Section 23: SE1/4 NE1/4, SE1/4 13 Sections 24 - 29 14 Section 32: N1/2 NE1/4, N1/2 NW1/4 15 Section 34: excluding NW1/4 NW1/4 16 Sections 35 - 36; 17 (71) Township 1 South, Range 5 West, Fairbanks Meridian 18 Sections 1 - 12 19 Section 13: N1/2 20 Sections 14 - 22 21 Section 23: S1/2 22 Section 28: E1/2 23 Sections 29 - 30 24 Section 31: NE1/4, E1/2 NW1/4, Government Lots 1-3, NE1/4 25 SW1/4, N1/2 SE1/4 26 Section 32: N1/2, N1/2 SW1/4, N1/2 SE1/4; 27 (72) Township 1 South, Range 6 West, Fairbanks Meridian 28 Sections 1 - 4 29 Section 9: excluding USS 4448C 30 Sections 10 - 15 31 Section 16: excluding USS 4448C 01 Sections 21 - 28 02 Sections 32: excluding USS 4153C 03 Sections 33 - 34 04 Section 35: E1/2 05 Section 36: N1/2; 06 (73) Township 1 South, Range 8 West, Fairbanks Meridian 07 Section 3: excluding USS 4461A, USS 4354B, and USS 4447C 08 Section 4: excluding USS 4461A and USS 4354B 09 Section 5 10 Section 6: excluding USS 4463 11 Section 7: excluding USS 9966 12 Section 8: excluding USS 9966 13 Sections 9 - 10 14 Section 15: excluding USS 9967 15 Section 16: excluding USS 9967 16 Sections 17 - 20 17 Section 21: excluding USS 4071A, USS 4257A, and USS 9968 18 Section 22: excluding USS 4466B 19 Section 27 20 Section 28: excluding USS 4071A 21 Sections 29 - 31 22 Section 32: excluding USS 9969 23 Section 33: excluding USS 9969 24 Section 34; 25 (74) Township 1 South, Range 10 West, Fairbanks Meridian 26 Sections 1 - 6; 27 (75) Township 1 South, Range 11 West, Fairbanks Meridian 28 Sections 1 - 4 29 Section 5: excluding USS 2350 30 Section 6: excluding USS 2350, USS 13837, and ASLS 90-87, 31 Plat 95-1, Manley Hot Springs Recording District 01 Section 7: excluding USS 13837, USS 1343, and ASLS 90-87, 02 Plat 95-1, Manley Hot Springs Recording District 03 Sections 8 - 24 04 Sections 27 - 34; 05 (76) Township 1 South, Range 12 West, Fairbanks Meridian 06 Section 1: excluding USS 9961 07 Section 2 08 Section 11 09 Section 12: excluding USS 1343 and USS 9961 10 Sections 13 - 14 11 Section 21: SE1/4 12 Sections 22 - 28 13 Section 31: south of the ordinary high water mark of the right 14 bank of Tanana River 15 Section 32: south of the ordinary high water mark of the right 16 bank of Tanana River 17 Section 33: excluding USS 4451B 18 Sections 34 - 36; 19 (77) Township 1 South, Range 13 West, Fairbanks Meridian 20 Section 27: northeast of the ordinary high water mark of the left 21 bank of the most westerly branch of Tanana River, excluding 22 ASLS 2005-26, Plat 2008-33 Fairbanks Recording District 23 Section 34: northeast of the ordinary high water mark of the left 24 bank of the most westerly branch of Tanana River 25 Section 35: northeast of the ordinary high water mark of the left 26 bank of the most westerly branch of Tanana River 27 Section 36: northeast of the ordinary high water mark of the left 28 bank of the most westerly branch of Tanana River; 29 (78) Township 2 South, Range 3 West, Fairbanks Meridian 30 Section 2: N1/2, Tract F, ASLS 80-118, Plat 81-66 Fairbanks 31 Recording District 01 Sections 3 - 10 02 Section 13: Tract C, as shown on U.S. Rectangular Survey Plat 03 filed September 5, 2006 04 Section 14: Government Lot 7 05 Sections 15 - 19 06 Section 20 07 Section 21: north of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation, 08 excluding Government Lot 6 09 Section 22: north of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation 10 Section 23: north of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation 11 Section 24: north of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation 12 Section 28: north of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation, 13 excluding Government Lots 1 and 2 14 Section 29: north of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation 15 Section 30: excluding Government Lots 5 and 8 16 Section 31: excluding Government Lots 2-4 17 Section 32: north and west of Fort Wainwright Military 18 Reservation; 19 (79) Township 2 South, Range 4 West, Fairbanks Meridian 20 Sections 1 - 3 21 Section 4: E1/2, SW1/4 22 Section 7: SE1/4 SE1/4 23 Section 8: SW1/4 NE1/4, NE1/4 SW1/4, SW1/4 SW1/4, SE1/4 24 SE1/4, and Tracts A, B, C, D, E, F, G, H, and I, ASCS Plat 85- 25 15, Fairbanks Recording District; excluding ADL 419455 26 Section 9: excluding ADL 419454 27 Sections 10 - 16 28 Section 17: excluding ADL 419455 29 Sections 18 - 36; 30 (80) Township 2 South, Range 5 West, Fairbanks Meridian 31 Sections 1 - 2 01 Sections 7 - 25 02 Section 26: W1/2 NE1/4, S1/2 SE1/4 NE1/4, E1/2 NW1/4, E1/2 03 SW1/4, SE1/4 04 Section 27: E1/2 NE1/4, NW1/4 NE1/4, N1/2 SW1/4 NE1/4, 05 NE1/4 SE1/4 north of the Parks Highway right of way, N1/2 06 NW1/4, N1/2 S1/2 NW1/4 excluding Grouse Ridge 07 Subdivision, Plat 2004-114, Fairbanks Recording District, and 08 the Parks Highway right of way; 09 Section 28, excluding all of the following: N1/2 N1/2 SW1/4 10 NE1/4, S1/2 N1/2 NW1/4 NE1/4, S1/2 NW1/4 NE1/4, W1/2 11 SW1/4 NE1/4 NE1/4, SW1/4 NW1/4 NE1/4 NE1/4, NW1/4 12 NW1/4 SE1/4 NE1/4 as described in U.S. Patent 50-66-0534 13 Section 29: Tract B, ASCS Plat 2009-33, Fairbanks Recording 14 District, south of the Parks Highway right of way 15 Sections 31 - 33 16 Section 34: excluding N1/2 NE1/4 17 Sections 35 - 36; 18 (81) Township 2 South, Range 6 West, Fairbanks Meridian 19 Section 3 20 Section 4: excluding the SE1/4 SW1/4 21 Section 5 22 Section 6: NE1/4, NE1/4 NW1/4 23 Sections 8 - 12 24 Section 16 25 Section 18: southeast of the Alaska Railroad right of way; 26 (82) Township 2 South, Range 7 West, Fairbanks Meridian 27 Section 35: SE1/4 SE1/4 28 Section 36: SE1/4 NE1/4, E1/2 SW1/4, SW1/4 SW1/4, SE1/4; 29 (83) Township 2 South, Range 11 West, Fairbanks Meridian 30 Section 6; 31 (84) Township 2 South, Range 12 West, Fairbanks Meridian 01 Sections 1 - 2 02 Section 3: excluding USS 4451B 03 Section 4: excluding USS 4451B 04 Sections 5 - 15 05 Section 16: excluding USS 10470 06 Sections 17 - 24 07 Sections 27 - 34; 08 (85) Township 2 South, Range 13 West, Fairbanks Meridian 09 Sections 1 - 6 10 Section 7: Tracts A, B, and C, ASLS 81-54, Plat 81-6, Manley 11 Hot Springs Recording District, S1/2 south of Iksgiza Lake 12 Section 8: NE1/4, Tracts D, E, F, ASLS 81-54, Plat 81-6, 13 Manley Hot Springs Recording District 14 Sections 9 - 30 15 Sections 32 - 36; 16 (86) Township 2 South, Range 14 West, Fairbanks Meridian 17 Sections 1 - 2 18 Section 3: NE1/4, E1/2 NW1/4, S1/2 19 Section 4: S1/2 SE1/4 20 Section 9: NE1/4, NE1/4 NW1/4, S1/2 NW1/4, S1/2 21 Sections 10 - 15 22 Section 16: E1/2, N1/2 NW1/4, SE1/4 NW1/4, E1/2 SW1/4 23 Section 21: E1/2, E1/2 NW1/4, E1/2 SW1/4 24 Sections 22 - 27 25 Section 28: E1/2, NE1/4 NW1/4 26 Sections 33 - 36; 27 (87) Township 3 South, Range 3 West, Fairbanks Meridian 28 Section 5: north of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation 29 Section 6: north of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation 30 Section 7: north of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation; 31 (88) Township 3 South, Range 4 West, Fairbanks Meridian 01 Sections 1 - 10 02 Section 11: north of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation 03 Section 12: north of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation 04 Section 14: north of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation 05 Section 15: north of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation 06 Section 16 07 Section 17: north of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation 08 Section 20: north of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation 09 Section 21: north of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation 10 Section 22: north of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation; 11 (89) Township 3 South, Range 5 West, Fairbanks Meridian 12 Sections 1 - 12 13 Section 13: NW1/4 NW1/4, Government Lots 2-3 14 Section 14: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left 15 bank of Tanana River 16 Section 15: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left 17 bank of Tanana River 18 Section 16 19 Section 17: excluding SW1/4 SW1/4 20 Section 18: excluding SE1/4 SE1/4 21 Section 19: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left 22 bank of Tanana River, excluding NE1/4 NE1/4 23 Section 20: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left 24 bank of Tanana River, excluding Government Lots 1 and 3 25 Section 21: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left 26 bank of Tanana River 27 Section 22: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left 28 bank of Tanana River 29 Section 31: Government Lot 2; 30 (90) Township 3 South, Range 6 West, Fairbanks Meridian 31 Sections 9 - 24 01 Section 25: excluding ASLS 92-188, Plat 95-26, Nenana 02 Recording District, and Government Lots 6 and 7 03 Sections 26 - 36; 04 (91) Township 3 South, Range 7 West, Fairbanks Meridian 05 Section 1: excluding the S1/2 of Government Lot 1, the N1/2 06 SE1/4 NE1/4, and S1/2 SW1/4 SW1/4 07 Section 2: NE1/4, Tracts C-1, C-3, C-4, and Tract E excluding 08 S1/2 SE1/4 SE1/4, in ASCS Plat 85-6, Nenana Recording 09 District 10 Section 3: Tract E-4, ASCS Plat 85-6, Nenana Recording 11 District 12 Section 10: Tract C-1, Plat 85-6, Nenana Recording District 13 Section 11: N1/2 SE1/4, and N1/2 excluding N1/2 NE1/4 NE1/4 14 Section 12: N1/2 SW1/4, N1/2 SE1/4, and N1/2 excluding N1/2 15 NW1/4 NW1/4 16 Section 14: S1/2 NE1/4, S1/2 NW1/4, S1/2 17 Section 15 18 Section 16: Tracts A, F, G and SE1/4, ASCS Amended Plat 82- 19 10, Nenana Recording District 20 Section 20: S1/2 NE1/4 NE1/4, S1/2 NE1/4, SE1/4 SE1/4 21 NW1/4, E1/2 SW1/4, N1/2 NW1/4 SW1/4, E1/2 SW1/4 22 SW1/4, SW1/4 SW1/4 SW1/4, SE1/4 23 Sections 21 - 29 24 Sections 31 - 36; 25 (92) Township 3 South, Range 12 West, Fairbanks Meridian 26 Sections 3 - 10 27 Sections 15 - 18 28 Section 19: excluding USS 12834 29 Sections 30 - 33; 30 (93) Township 3 South, Range 13 West, Fairbanks Meridian 31 Section 12: E1/2 01 Section 13 02 Section 14: E1/2 03 Section 24: excluding USS 12834 04 Section 25 05 Section 26: E1/2 06 Sections 35 - 36; 07 (94) Township 3 South, Range 14 West, Fairbanks Meridian 08 Section 1 09 Sections 12 - 13 10 Sections 24 - 25 11 Section 36; 12 (95) Township 4 South, Range 4 East, Fairbanks Meridian 13 Section 30: west of the ordinary high water mark of the right 14 bank of the Tanana River 15 Section 31: west of the ordinary high water mark of the right 16 bank of the Tanana River 17 Section 32: west of the ordinary high water mark of the right 18 bank of the Tanana River; 19 (96) Township 4 South, Range 5 East, Fairbanks Meridian 20 Sections 23 - 26 21 Section 27: S1/2 22 Section 28: E1/2 SE1/4, SW1/4 SE1/4 23 Section 30: E1/2 SW1/4, Government Lots 4-5, SE1/4 24 Section 31: excluding Government Lot 4 25 Sections 32 - 36; 26 (97) Township 4 South, Range 6 East, Fairbanks Meridian 27 Sections 19 - 23 28 Section 27: N1/2 29 Section 28: N1/2 30 Section 29: N1/2 31 Section 30; 01 (98) Township 4 South, Range 8 East, Fairbanks Meridian 02 Section 13: SE1/4 NE1/4, E1/2 SW1/4, SW1/4 SW1/4, SE1/4 03 Section 21: SE1/4 04 Section 22: excluding NW1/4 05 Sections 23 - 28 06 Section 29: E1/2, E1/2 SW1/4 07 Section 31: SE1/4 08 Section 32: excluding W1/2 NW1/4 09 Sections 33 - 36; 10 (99) Township 4 South, Range 9 East, Fairbanks Meridian 11 Section 1: excluding W1/2 NW1/4 12 Section 2: SE1/4 13 Section 9: S1/2 14 Section 10: excluding NW1/4 15 Sections 11 - 17 16 Section 18: S1/2 17 Sections 19 - 36; 18 (100) Township 4 South, Range 6 West, Fairbanks Meridian 19 Sections 1 - 5 20 Section 6: excluding SE1/4 SW1/4 21 Section 7: excluding NE1/4 NW1/4 22 Section 8: excluding ASLS 79-187, Plat 80-3, Nenana 23 Recording District 24 Sections 9 - 10 25 Section 11: Government Lot 6, SW1/4 SW1/4, E1/2 SW1/4, 26 W1/2 SE1/4, SE1/4 SE1/4, and that portion north of the 27 ordinary high water mark of the left bank of the Tanana River 28 Section 12: excluding Government Lots 4 and 6, N1/2 SW1/4 29 SW1/4, and SE1/4 SE1/4 30 Sections 14 - 18; 31 (101) Township 4 South, Range 7 West, Fairbanks Meridian 01 Sections 1 - 2 02 Section 3: excluding Government Lot 8, N1/2 SE1/4, and SE1/4 03 SE1/4 04 Sections 4 - 9 05 Section 10: Government Lots 2-3 06 Sections 11 - 12 07 Section 13: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left 08 bank of Tanana River 09 Section 14: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left 10 bank of Tanana River 11 Section 16 12 Section 18: Government Lots 3-6; 13 (102) Township 4 South, Range 13 West, Fairbanks Meridian 14 Sections 1 - 2 15 Section 3: south and east of the ordinary high water mark of the 16 left bank of Kantishna River 17 Section 4: east of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 18 of Kantishna River 19 Section 8: east of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 20 of Kantishna River 21 Section 9: south and east of the ordinary high water mark of the 22 left bank of Kantishna River 23 Section 10: south of the ordinary high water mark of the left 24 bank of Kantishna River 25 Section 11 26 Section 15 27 Section 16: north and east of the ordinary high water mark of 28 the left bank of Kantishna River 29 Section 17: east of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 30 of Kantishna River 31 Section 20: east of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 01 of Kantishna River 02 Section 21: east of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 03 of Kantishna River 04 Section 22 05 Section 27: east of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 06 of Kantishna River 07 Section 28: north and east of the ordinary high water mark of 08 the left bank of Kantishna River 09 Section 29: east of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 10 of Kantishna River 11 Section 33: south and east of the ordinary high water mark of 12 the left bank of Kantishna River 13 Section 34: south and east of the ordinary high water mark of 14 the left bank of Kantishna River; 15 (103) Township 5 South, Range 4 East, Fairbanks Meridian 16 Section 5: excluding that portion east of the ordinary high water 17 mark of the right bank of the most easterly channel of the 18 Tanana River 19 Section 6 20 Section 7: east of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation 21 Section 8 22 Section 17 23 Section 18: east of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation 24 Section 19: east of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation 25 Section 20 26 Section 29: excluding F-001034 27 Section 30: east of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation 28 Section 31 29 Section 32: excluding NE1/4 SE1/4 and Government Lots 1-4; 30 (104) Township 5 South, Range 5 East, Fairbanks Meridian 31 Sections 1 - 5 01 Section 6: NE1/4 NE1/4 02 Sections 7 - 10 03 Sections 25 - 29 04 Sections 33 - 36; 05 (105) Township 5 South, Range 6 East, Fairbanks Meridian 06 Section 24: SE1/4 SW1/4, S1/2 SE1/4 07 Section 25 08 Section 26: NE1/4 NE1/4, S1/2 NE1/4, SE1/4 NW1/4, S1/2 09 Section 27: S1/2 10 Sections 28 - 29 11 Section 30: S1/2 12 Sections 31 - 36; 13 (106) Township 5 South, Range 7 East, Fairbanks Meridian 14 Section 1: SE1/4 SE1/4 15 Section 10: SE1/4 SE1/4 16 Section 11: SE1/4 NE1/4, S1/2 SW1/4, SE1/4 17 Section 12: NE1/4, S1/2 NW1/4, S1/2 18 Sections 13 - 14 19 Section 15: NE1/4, E1/2 NW1/4, SW1/4 NW1/4, S1/2 20 Section 16: S1/2 NE1/4, S1/2 21 Section 17: S1/2 SE1/4 22 Section 19: S1/2 NE1/4, S1/2 23 Sections 20 - 36; 24 (107) Township 5 South, Range 8 East, Fairbanks Meridian; 25 Sections 1 - 10 26 Section 11: excluding ASLS 94-105, Plat 96-35, Fairbanks 27 Recording District 28 Sections 12 - 36; 29 (108) Township 5 South, Range 9 East, Fairbanks Meridian 30 Sections 4 - 9 31 Sections 13 - 36; 01 (109) Township 5 South, Range 10 East, Fairbanks Meridian 02 Section 26: S1/2 03 Section 27: E1/2, E1/2 SW1/4, SW1/4 SW1/4 04 Section 32: SE1/4 SE1/4 05 Section 33: SE1/4 NE1/4, SW1/4, SE1/4 06 Sections 34 - 35 07 Section 36: S1/2 NE1/4, W1/2, SE1/4; 08 (110) Township 5 South, Range 11 East, Fairbanks Meridian 09 Section 31: S1/2 NW1/4, S1/2 10 Section 36: SE1/4 NE1/4, SE1/4 SW1/4, NE1/4 SE1/4, S1/2 11 SE1/4; 12 (111) Township 5 South, Range 12 East, Fairbanks Meridian 13 Section 10: S1/2 SE1/4 14 Section 11: S1/2 SW1/4, SE1/4 15 Section 12: SW1/4, S1/2 SE1/4 16 Section 13 - 15 17 Section 16: SE1/4 NE1/4, E1/2 SE1/4 18 Section 21: E1/2 NE1/4, E1/2 SE1/4 19 Section 22 20 Section 23: N1/2, SW1/4, N1/2 SE1/4, SW1/4 SE1/4 21 Section 24: NW1/4 NE1/4, NW1/4 22 Section 25: NE1/4 NE1/4, S1/2 NE1/4, SE1/4 SW1/4, SE1/4 23 Section 26: NW1/4 NW1/4 24 Section 27: N1/2, N1/2 SW1/4, SW1/4 SW1/4 25 Section 28: NE1/4 NE1/4, S1/2 NE1/4, SE1/4 NW1/4, S1/2 26 Section 29: S1/2 SW1/4, S1/2 SE1/4 27 Section 31 28 Section 32: N1/2, SW1/4, N1/2 SE1/4, SW1/4 SE1/4 29 Section 33: NW1/4 NE1/4, NW1/4 30 Section 35: SE1/4 NE1/4, SE1/4 SW1/4, SE1/4 31 Section 36; 01 (112) Township 5 South, Range 8 West, Fairbanks Meridian 02 Sections 3 - 4 03 Section 5: N1/2 southeast of the ordinary high water mark of the 04 right bank of the Nenana River, SE1/4, excluding USS 9939 05 Section 8: E1/2 06 Section 9 07 Section 10: N1/2 08 Section 16 09 Section 17: E1/2 10 Section 20: NE1/4, S1/2 11 Section 21: N1/2 12 Section 29 13 Section 31: E1/2 14 Section 32; 15 (113) Township 6 South, Range 4 East, Fairbanks Meridian 16 Section 5: excluding Government Lots 1 and 2 17 Section 6: east of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation 18 Section 7: east of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation 19 Section 8 20 Section 9: excluding S1/2 S1/2 NE1/4, N1/2 NE1/4 SE1/4, and 21 Government Lot 5 22 Section 14: Government Lot 4 23 Section 15: south of the ordinary high water mark of the right 24 bank of Tanana River 25 Section 16: northeast of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation 26 Section 21: east of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation 27 Section 22: east of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation 28 Section 23: Government Lots 3, 5, 6, 11, and 12 and that portion 29 west of the ordinary high water mark of the right bank of 30 Tanana River 31 Section 25: Government Lots 3 and 8 and that portion west of 01 the ordinary high water mark of the right bank of Tanana 02 River 03 Section 26: excluding Government Lots 1 and 7 04 Section 27: east of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation 05 Section 35: east of Fort Wainwright Military Reservation 06 Section 36: W1/2 SW1/4; 07 (114) Township 6 South, Range 5 East, Fairbanks Meridian 08 Sections 1 - 4 09 Sections 9 - 15 10 Section 16: NE1/4, S1/2 11 Section 20: S1/2 12 Sections 21 - 28 13 Section 29: N1/2 14 Section 36; 15 (115) Township 6 South, Range 6 East, Fairbanks Meridian; 16 (116) Township 6 South, Range 7 East, Fairbanks Meridian 17 Sections 1 - 19 18 Section 20: excluding ASLS 74-88, Plat 74-120, Fairbanks 19 Recording District 20 Sections 21 - 36; 21 (117) Township 6 South, Range 8 East, Fairbanks Meridian; 22 (118) Township 6 South, Range 9 East, Fairbanks Meridian; 23 (119) Township 6 South, Range 10 East, Fairbanks Meridian; 24 (120) Township 6 South, Range 11 East, Fairbanks Meridian 25 Section 1 26 Section 2: SE1/4 NE1/4, S1/2 27 Section 3: SW1/4, S1/2 SE1/4 28 Section 4: S1/2 29 Section 5: W1/2 NW1/4, SE1/4 NW1/4, S1/2 30 Sections 6 - 11 31 Section 12: N1/2, N1/2 SW1/4, SW1/4 SW1/4 01 Section 14: N1/2 NE1/4, SW1/4 NE1/4, NW1/4, N1/2 SW1/4, 02 SW1/4 SW1/4 03 Section 15 - 21 04 Section 22: N1/2, SW1/4, W1/2 NE1/4 SE1/4, W1/2 SE1/4 05 Section 25: E1/2, SE1/4 NW1/4, E1/2 SW1/4 06 Section 27: NW1/4, NW1/4 SW1/4 07 Sections 28 - 32 08 Section 33: N1/2 NE1/4, SW1/4 NE1/4, NW1/4, N1/2 SW1/4 09 Section 36: E1/2, NE1/4 NW1/4; 10 (121) Township 6 South, Range 12 East, Fairbanks Meridian 11 Sections 1 - 2 12 Section 3: SE1/4 NE1/4, SE1/4 13 Section 5: N1/2 NW1/4 14 Section 6: N1/2, SW1/4, NW1/4 SE1/4 15 Section 7: NW1/4 NW1/4 16 Section 9: E1/2 SE1/4 17 Section 10: NE1/4, E1/2 NW1/4, SW1/4 NW1/4, S1/2 18 Sections 11 - 15 19 Section 16: NE1/4, SE1/4 NW1/4, S1/2 20 Section 20: S1/2 NE1/4, NE1/4 NE1/4, E1/2 SW1/4, SE1/4 21 Sections 21 - 36; 22 (122) Township 6 South, Range 8 West, Fairbanks Meridian 23 Section 5: excluding Government Lots 1, 7, and 10 24 Section 6: Government Lots 7, 8, and 13 25 Section 7: E1/2 NE1/4, E1/2 SE1/4, Government Lots 1, 6, 7, 26 and 12 27 Section 8: NW1/4 NE1/4, NW1/4, NE1/4 SW1/4, W1/2 SW1/4, 28 Government Lots 1, 2, 5, and 6 29 Section 17: W1/2 NW1/4, Government Lots 1, 2, 3, and 4 30 Section 18: excluding Government Lot 2 31 Section 19: W1/2 NE1/4, E1/2 NW1/4, NE1/4 SW1/4, 01 Government Lots 1-8 02 Section 20: Government Lot 1 03 Section 30: Government Lots 1, 2, 3, and 4 04 Section 31: Government Lot 1; 05 (123) Township 6 South, Range 9 West, Fairbanks Meridian 06 Section 12: SE1/4 SW1/4, SE1/4 07 Section 13 08 Section 14: SE1/4 NE1/4, SE1/4 09 Section 23: E1/2 10 Section 24 - 25 11 Section 26: E1/2, E1/2 SW1/4 12 Section 35: E1/2, E1/2 NW1/4, E1/2 SW1/4 13 Section 36; 14 (124) Township 7 South, Range 4 East, Fairbanks Meridian 15 Section 4: S1/2 SW1/4 16 Section 9: W1/2, SE1/4 17 Section 12: southwest of the ordinary high water mark of the 18 left bank of the Tanana River 19 Section 13: southwest of the ordinary high water mark of the 20 left bank of the Tanana River, excluding ASLS 85-11, Plat 87- 21 108; ASLS 87-201, Plat 89-113; and ASLS 87-200, Plat 89- 22 114, all Fairbanks Recording District. 23 Sections 15 - 16 24 Sections 21 - 23 25 Section 24: excluding ASLS 87-201, Plat 89-113, Fairbanks 26 Recording District 27 Sections 25 - 28; 28 (125) Township 7 South, Range 5 East, Fairbanks Meridian 29 Section 1: N1/2 30 Section 16: southwest of the ordinary high water mark of the 31 left bank of the Tanana River 01 Section 17: south of the ordinary high water mark of the left 02 bank of the Tanana River 03 Section 18: south of the ordinary high water mark of the left 04 bank of the Tanana River 05 Section 19 - 20 06 Section 21: southwest of the ordinary high water mark of the 07 left bank of the Tanana River 08 Section 22: southwest of the ordinary high water mark of the 09 left bank of the Tanana River 10 Section 23: southwest of the ordinary high water mark of the 11 left bank of the Tanana River 12 Section 26: west of the ordinary high water mark of the left 13 bank of the Tanana River 14 Sections 27 - 30 15 Sections 33 - 34 16 Section 35: west of the ordinary high water mark of the left 17 bank of the Tanana River; 18 (126) Township 7 South, Range 6 East, Fairbanks Meridian 19 Sections 1 - 5 20 Section 8: N1/2, SW1/4, W1/2 SE1/4 21 Section 9: N1/2, NE1/4 SW1/4, S1/2 SW1/4, SE1/4 22 Sections 10 - 15 23 Section 16: SE1/4 NE1/4 SE1/4, NE1/4 SE1/4 SE1/4 24 Section 21: N1/2, SE1/4 25 Sections 22 - 28 26 Section 29: S1/2 27 Section 30: S1/2 28 Sections 31 - 36; 29 (127) Township 7 South, Range 7 East, Fairbanks Meridian 30 Sections 1 - 18 31 Section 19: north of the Richardson Highway right of way 01 Section 20: N1/2 NE1/4, W1/2 north of the Richardson 02 Highway right of way 03 Section 21: N1/2 NE1/4, N1/2 NW1/4, SW1/4 NW1/4, NW1/4 04 SW1/4 north of the Richardson Highway right of way 05 Section 22: W1/2 NE1/4 NW1/4, E1/2 SE1/4 06 Section 23 - 24 07 Section 25: excluding ASLS 81-213, Plat 82-141, Fairbanks 08 Recording District 09 Section 26: excluding ASLS 81-213 except Tract A, Plat 82- 10 141, Fairbanks Recording District 11 Section 27: NE1/4 NE1/4 12 Sections 31 - 34: south of the ordinary high water mark of the 13 left bank of the Tanana River 14 Sections 35 - 36; 15 (128) Township 7 South, Range 8 East, Fairbanks Meridian 16 Sections 1 - 12 17 Section 13: N1/2 NW1/4 18 Section 14: N1/2 NE1/4, N1/2 NW1/4 19 Sections 15: excluding EPF 2008-31, Plat 2010-141, Fairbanks 20 Recording District, and E1/2 SE1/4 SE1/4 21 Section 16 - 21 22 Section 22: NE1/4, W1/2 23 Section 27: N1/2 NW1/4, SW1/4 NW1/4, W1/2 SW1/4, SE1/4 24 SW1/4, SW1/4 SE1/4, S1/2 SE1/4 SE1/4 25 Sections 28 - 32 26 Section 34: N1/2 excluding NE1/4 NE1/4; 27 (129) Township 7 South, Range 9 East, Fairbanks Meridian 28 Sections 1 - 12 29 Section 13: N1/2 30 Section 14: N1/2, NW1/4 SW1/4 31 Sections 15 - 16 01 Section 17: NE1/4, E1/2 NW1/4; 02 (130) Township 7 South, Range 10 East, Fairbanks Meridian 03 Section 1: N1/2, SW1/4 04 Sections 2 - 8 05 Section 9: N1/2, N1/2 SW1/4 06 Section 10: N1/2 07 Section 24: excluding ASLS 82-173, Plat 83-28, Fairbanks 08 Recording District 09 Section 25 10 Sections 35 - 36; 11 (131) Township 7 South, Range 11 East, Fairbanks Meridian 12 Sections 1 - 2 13 Section 5: N1/2 NW1/4 14 Section 6: N1/2 15 Sections 11 - 14 16 Sections 19 - 36; 17 (132) Township 7 South, Range 12 East, Fairbanks Meridian; 18 (133) Township 7 South, Range 13 East, Fairbanks Meridian 19 Section 1: NW1/4 20 Section 2: N1/2 21 Section 3 - 9 22 Section 10: NW1/4 23 Section 16: N1/2, SW1/4 24 Section 17 - 20 25 Section 21: W1/2 26 Section 28: W1/2 27 Section 29 - 32 28 Section 33: W1/2; 29 (134) Township 7 South, Range 9 West, Fairbanks Meridian 30 Section 1: Government Lots 2, 3, 4, 5, 9, and 10 31 Section 2 01 Section 3: Tracts A and B, Plat 79-5, Nenana Recording District 02 Section 10: E1/2 NE1/4, E1/2 SE1/4 03 Section 11 04 Section 12: Those portions of Government Lot 3 and NW1/4 05 NW1/4 northwest of the ordinary high water mark of the left 06 bank of the Nenana River 07 Section 14: Tracts A and B, Plat 79-5, Nenana Recording 08 District 09 Section 15: E1/2 NE1/4, E1/2 SE1/4 10 Section 22: E1/2 NE1/4, E1/2 SE1/4 11 Section 23: Tracts A and B, Plat 79-5, Nenana Recording 12 District 13 Section 26: Tracts A, B, C, and D, Plat 79-5, Nenana Recording 14 District 15 Section 27: E1/2 NE1/4, SE1/4, and Tracts H and K of ASLS 16 79-158, Plat 80-4, Nenana Recording District 17 Section 28: Tracts K, U, and T, ASLS 79-158, Plat 80-4, Nenana 18 Recording District 19 Section 33: Tracts J, K, U, V, and W, ASLS 79-158, Plat 80-4, 20 Nenana Recording District 21 Section 34 22 Section 35: Tracts A and B, Plat 79-5, Nenana Recording 23 District; 24 (135) Township 8 South, Range 5 East, Fairbanks Meridian 25 Section 1: south of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 26 of the Tanana River 27 Section 2: south of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 28 of the Tanana River, excluding Fort Greely Military 29 Reservation 30 Section 3: east of the ordinary high water mark of the right bank 31 of the Little Delta River, excluding Fort Greely Military 01 Reservation 02 Section 4: E1/2 03 Section 9: E1/2 04 Sections 11 - 13: excluding Fort Greely Military Reservation; 05 (136) Township 8 South, Range 6 East, Fairbanks Meridian 06 Sections 1 - 3 07 Sections 4 - 6: south of the ordinary high water mark of the left 08 bank of the Tanana River 09 Sections 7 - 16 10 Sections 17 - 18: excluding Fort Greely Military Reservation 11 Sections 20 - 21: excluding Fort Greely Military Reservation 12 Sections 22 - 26 13 Sections 27 - 28: excluding Fort Greely Military Reservation 14 Sections 34 - 36: excluding Fort Greely Military Reservation; 15 (137) Township 8 South, Range 7 East, Fairbanks Meridian 16 Section 1 17 Section 2: NW1/4, S1/2 18 Sections 3 - 11 19 Section 12: excluding USS 4224 20 Section 13 - 36; 21 (138) Township 8 South, Range 8 East, Fairbanks Meridian 22 Sections 4 - 6 23 Section 7: SW1/4 SE1/4, SW1/4 excluding USS 4224 24 Section 13: SW1/4 SW1/4 25 Section 14: SW1/4, S1/2 SE1/4 26 Section 15: SW1/4 NE1/4, S1/2 NW1/4, S1/2 27 Section 16: NE1/4, S1/2 NW1/4, S1/2 28 Section 17: excluding USS 4163 29 Section 18: excluding USS 4163 and USS 4224 30 Section 19 31 Section 20: excluding USS 4163 01 Section 21: excluding USS 4163 02 Section 22: N1/2 03 Section 23: N1/2 04 Section 24: excluding ASLS 88-129, Plat 89-121; and ASLS 87- 05 208, Plat 90-72, both Fairbanks Recording District 06 Section 29: W1/2 07 Sections 30 - 32 08 Section 33: SW1/4; 09 (139) Township 8 South, Range 9 East, Fairbanks Meridian 10 Section 18: SW1/4 SW1/4 11 Section 19: NW1/4, S1/2; excluding ASLS 87-208, Plat 90-72; 12 ASLS 87-371, Plat 89-8; and Tracts B-D ASLS 91-82, Plat 13 94-97, all Fairbanks Recording District 14 Section 28: S1/2 15 Section 29: E1/2, NW1/4 16 Section 30: N1/2, excluding ASLS 87-371, Plat 89-8, Fairbanks 17 Recording District 18 Section 32: N1/2 NE1/4 19 Section 33: N1/2 NE1/4, N1/2 NW1/4 20 Section 34: N1/2, E1/2 SW1/4, SE1/4 21 Section 35: SW1/4; 22 (140) Township 8 South, Range 10 East, Fairbanks Meridian 23 Sections 1 - 2 24 Section 3: S1/2 25 Section 8: northeast of the ordinary high water mark of Quartz 26 Lake, excluding EPF 69-053, Plats 72-5 and 72-6, Fairbanks 27 Recording District 28 Sections 9 - 15 29 Sections 22 - 24 30 Sections 25 - 26: north of the ordinary high water mark of the 31 right bank of the Tanana River 01 Section 27: north of the ordinary high water mark of the right 02 bank of the Tanana River, excluding ASLS 75-106, Plat 77-30, 03 Fairbanks Recording District 04 Section 28: E1/2, SW1/4 05 Section 31 06 Section 32: northwest of the ordinary high water mark of the 07 right bank of the Tanana River 08 Section 33: north of the ordinary high water mark of the right 09 bank of the Tanana River, excluding ASLS 71-15, Plat 71- 10 11875; ASLS 74-98, Plat 75-49; ASLS 75-78, Plat 77-82; 11 ASLS 82-129, Plat 83-96; and ASLS 74-57, all Fairbanks 12 Recording District 13 Section 34: north of the ordinary high water mark of the right 14 bank of the Tanana River; 15 (141) Township 8 South, Range 11 East, Fairbanks Meridian 16 Section 1 - 26 17 Section 27: excluding USS 2880 18 Section 28: N1/2 19 Section 29 20 Section 30: north of the ordinary high water mark of the right 21 bank of the Tanana River, excluding ASLS 75-51, Plat 76-73, 22 Fairbanks Recording District 23 Section 31: northeast of the ordinary high water mark of the 24 right bank of the Tanana River 25 Section 36; 26 (142) Township 8 South, Range 12 East, Fairbanks Meridian 27 Sections 1 - 23 28 Section 24: N1/2, SW1/4 29 Sections 27 - 34; 30 (143) Township 8 South, Range 13 East, Fairbanks Meridian 31 Sections 5 - 7 01 Section 8: N1/2, SW1/4 02 Section 18: NW1/4 03 Sections 25 - 26 04 Sections 33 - 36; 05 (144) Township 8 South, Range 17 East, Fairbanks Meridian 06 Sections 19 - 20 07 Sections 29 - 33; 08 (145) Township 8 South, Range 9 West, Fairbanks Meridian 09 Section 2: west of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 10 of the Nenana River 11 Section 3: Tracts A and R, ASLS 80-120, Plat 86-3, Nenana 12 Recording District 13 Section 10: Tract S, ASLS 80-120, Plat 86-3, Nenana Recording 14 District 15 Section 11: west of the ordinary high water mark of the left 16 bank of the Nenana River 17 Section 14: Government Lot 8 north of the Parks Highway right 18 of way; 19 (146) Township 9 South, Range 7 East, Fairbanks Meridian 20 Sections 1 - 5 21 Sections 6 - 9: excluding Fort Greely Military Reservation 22 Sections 10 - 14 23 Sections 15 - 16: excluding Fort Greely Military Reservation 24 Section 22 - 23: excluding Fort Greely Military Reservation 25 Section 24 26 Section 25 - 26: excluding Fort Greely Military Reservation; 27 (147) Township 9 South, Range 8 East, Fairbanks Meridian 28 Sections 2 - 11 29 Sections 13 - 29 30 Sections 30 - 32: excluding Fort Greely Military Reservation 31 Sections 33 - 36; 01 (148) Township 9 South, Range 9 East, Fairbanks Meridian 02 Sections 9 - 11 03 Sections 14 - 23 04 Sections 26 - 30 05 Section 35; 06 (149) Township 9 South, Range 10 East, Fairbanks Meridian 07 Section 5: Government Lot 5 08 Section 6: Government Lots 1 - 2, S1/2 NE1/4, NE1/4 SW1/4 09 NW1/4, Government Lots 37 - 41, 44 - 49, 51 - 77, 80 - 89, 94 10 - 103, SE1/4 NE1/4 SW1/4, E1/2 NE1/4 SE1/4 SW1/4, N1/2 11 NE1/4 NE1/4 SE1/4, SW1/4 NE1/4 NE1/4 SE1/4, E1/2 12 NW1/4 NE1/4 SE1/4, E1/2 SW1/4 NE1/4 SE1/4, S1/2 SW1/4 13 NW1/4 SE1/4, NW1/4 SW1/4 SE1/4 14 Section 7: Government Lots 10 - 11 15 Section 18: Government Lots 1 - 2, 4 - 6, 9, and 10; SW1/4 16 SE1/4 17 Section 19: NE1/4 NE1/4 18 Section 20: west of the ordinary high water mark of the left 19 bank of the Delta River 20 Section 28: west of the ordinary high water mark of the left 21 bank of the Delta River 22 Section 29: Government Lots 1, 3, and 4; NE1/4 SE1/4 23 Section 33: west of the ordinary high water mark of the left 24 bank of the Delta River; 25 (150) Township 9 South, Range 11 East, Fairbanks Meridian 26 Section 3: S1/2 27 Sections 4 - 5 28 Sections 8 - 11 29 Sections 13 - 16 30 Section 17: E1/2, SW1/4 NW1/4, NE1/4 SW1/4 31 Sections 21 - 27 01 Section 28: NE1/4 excluding USS 4294; N1/2 NW1/4, SW1/4 02 NW1/4, W1/2 SW1/4; 03 (151) Township 9 South, Range 12 East, Fairbanks Meridian 04 Sections 19 - 21 05 Sections 28 - 36; 06 (152) Township 9 South, Range 13 East, Fairbanks Meridian 07 Sections 1 - 3 08 Section 10: E1/2 09 Sections 11 - 13 10 Sections 24 - 25 11 Section 26: S1/2 12 Section 27: excluding ASLS 75-140, Plat 78-136; ASLS 74-36, 13 Plat 80-199; and ASLS 74-177, Plat 78-213, all Fairbanks 14 Recording District 15 Section 28: NE1/4 16 Sections 34 - 35 17 Section 36: excluding USS 3792 and ASLS 76-213, Plat 83-50, 18 Fairbanks Recording District; 19 (153) Township 9 South, Range 14 East, Fairbanks Meridian; 20 (154) Township 9 South, Range 16 East, Fairbanks Meridian; 21 (155) Township 10 South, Range 8 East, Fairbanks Meridian 22 Sections 1 - 3 23 Section 4 - 5: excluding Fort Greely Military Reservation 24 Sections 9 - 11: excluding Fort Greely Military Reservation 25 Section 12 26 Sections 13 - 14: excluding Fort Greely Military Reservation 27 Section 24: excluding Fort Greely Military Reservation; 28 (156) Township 10 South, Range 9 East, Fairbanks Meridian 29 Section 7 30 Section 17 - 18 31 Section 19: excluding Fort Greely Military Reservation 01 Sections 20 - 21 02 Section 27 03 Sections 28 - 30: excluding Fort Greely Military Reservation 04 Sections 33 - 34: excluding Fort Greely Military Reservation 05 Sections 35 - 36; 06 (157) Township 10 South, Range 10 East, Fairbanks Meridian 07 Section 3: west of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 08 of the Delta River 09 Section 4: west of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 10 of the Delta River 11 Section 9 12 Section 10: west of the ordinary high water mark of the left 13 bank of the Delta River 14 Section 15: west of the ordinary high water mark of the left 15 bank of the Delta River 16 Section 16: excluding USS 6087 17 Section 17: E1/2 SE1/4 18 Section 19: SE1/4 19 Section 20 20 Section 21: west of the ordinary high water mark of the left 21 bank of the Delta River, excluding USS 6087 and USS 6093 22 Section 22: west of the ordinary high water mark of the left 23 bank of the Delta River 24 Section 28: west of the ordinary high water mark of the left 25 bank of the Delta River, excluding Fort Greely Military 26 Reservation 27 Sections 29 - 30 28 Sections 31 - 33: excluding Fort Greely Military Reservation; 29 (158) Township 10 South, Range 12 East, Fairbanks Meridian 30 Sections 1 - 3 31 Section 4: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 01 of Tanana River 02 Section 5: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 03 of Tanana River 04 Section 6: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 05 of Tanana River 06 Section 10: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left 07 bank of Tanana River 08 Section 11: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left 09 bank of Tanana River 10 Section 12: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left 11 bank of Tanana River; 12 (159) Township 10 South, Range 13 East, Fairbanks Meridian 13 Sections 1 - 6 14 Section 7: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 15 of Tanana River 16 Section 8: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 17 of Tanana River 18 Sections 9 - 12 19 Section 13: excluding the S1/2 SW1/4 SW1/4 20 Section 14: N1/2 21 Section 15: N1/2 22 Section 24: NE1/4, E1/2 NW1/4, N1/2 SE1/4, and SE1/4 SE1/4; 23 (160) Township 10 South, Range 14 East, Fairbanks Meridian 24 Sections 1 - 20 25 Section 21: N1/2 NE1/4, W1/2, NE1/4 SE1/4 26 Sections 22 - 24 27 Section 25: excluding Tracts C-1 and C-2, ASLS 98-34, Plat 99- 28 9, Fairbanks Recording District 29 Section 26: excluding Tract B-1, ASLS 98-34, Plat 99-9, 30 Fairbanks Recording District 31 Section 27: N1/2 NE1/4, NE1/4 NW1/4 01 Section 28: W1/2 02 Section 29 03 Section 30: NE1/4 NE1/4 04 Section 32: excluding Tract U, ASLS 78-93, Plat 79-40, 05 Fairbanks Recording District 06 Section 33: W1/2 07 Section 36: NE1/4 NE1/4; 08 (161) Township 10 South, Range 16 East, Fairbanks Meridian 09 Sections 1 - 35; 10 (162) Township 11 South, Range 9 East, Fairbanks Meridian 11 Sections 1 - 3: excluding Fort Greely Military Reservation 12 Section 11: excluding Fort Greely Military Reservation; 13 (163) Township 11 South, Range 10 East, Fairbanks Meridian 14 Section 6, excluding Fort Greely Military Reservation; 15 (164) Township 11 South, Range 14 East, Fairbanks Meridian 16 Section 4: NW1/4; Tracts A, B, and E, Plat 82-37, Fairbanks 17 Recording District 18 Section 5: excluding Tract U, ASLS 78-93, Plat 79-40, 19 Fairbanks Recording District 20 Section 9: E1/2; Tracts A and B, Plat 82-37, Fairbanks 21 Recording District 22 Section 10: Tracts B and C, Plat 82-37, Fairbanks Recording 23 District 24 Section 15: Tracts B and C, Plat 82-37, Fairbanks Recording 25 District 26 Section 16: E1/2; Tracts A and B, Plat 82-37, Fairbanks 27 Recording District 28 Section 21: Tracts A and B, Plat 82-37, Fairbanks Recording 29 District 30 Section 22: NW1/4; Tracts A, B, and D, Plat 82-37, Fairbanks 31 Recording District 01 Section 23: Tracts A, B, D, and E, Plat 82-37, Fairbanks 02 Recording District 03 Section 26: Tracts A, B, C, and D, Plat 82-37, Fairbanks 04 Recording District 05 Section 35: E1/2; Tracts A and B, Plat 82-37, Fairbanks 06 Recording District 07 Section 36: excluding USS 4013; 08 (165) Township 11 South, Range 15 East, Fairbanks Meridian 09 Section 31: SW1/4 SW1/4 west of the ordinary high water mark 10 of the right bank of the Tanana River; 11 (166) Township 11 South, Range 16 East, Fairbanks Meridian 12 Sections 13 - 16 13 Section 21: excluding USS 9420 14 Sections 22 - 30 15 Sections 32 - 36; 16 (167) Township 12 South, Range 14 East, Fairbanks Meridian 17 Section 1: excluding USS 4013 18 Section 2: excluding Tract T-2, ASLS 92-190, Plat 94-21, 19 Fairbanks Recording District 20 Section 11: excluding Tract T-2, ASLS 92-190, Plat 94-21, 21 Fairbanks Recording District 22 Sections 12 - 13 23 Section 14: excluding Tract T-2, ASLS 92-190, Plat 94-21, 24 Fairbanks Recording District and Tract M, ASLS 78-93, Plat 25 79-40, Fairbanks Recording District 26 Section 23: excluding Tract M, ASLS 78-93, Plat 79-40, 27 Fairbanks Recording District 28 Sections 24 - 25 29 Section 36; 30 (168) Township 12 South, Range 15 East, Fairbanks Meridian 31 Sections 2 - 6 01 Section 7: excluding Tract E-1-B, ASLS 90-89, Plat 90-46, 02 Fairbanks Recording District 03 Sections 8 - 11 04 Section 14 05 Section 15: E1/2; Tract C-2, ASLS 90-90, Plat 90-45, Fairbanks 06 Recording District 07 Section 18: W1/2 NW1/4, W1/2 SW1/4 08 Section 19: Tracts A-5 and B-5, EV-2-560, Plat 94-47, 09 Fairbanks Recording District 10 Section 21: S1/2 SE1/4 11 Section 22: excluding Tract 13, EV-2-676, Plat 2001-16, 12 Fairbanks Recording District 13 Section 23 14 Section 25 15 Sections 26 - 27: excluding ASLS 74-40, Plat 82-171, Fairbanks 16 Recording District 17 Sections 28 - 30 18 Section 31: Tract B, EV-2-676, Plat 2001-16, Fairbanks 19 Recording District 20 Section 32: excluding Tract 14, EV-2-676, Plat 2001-16, 21 Fairbanks Recording District 22 Sections 33 - 36; 23 (169) Township 12 South, Range 16 East, Fairbanks Meridian 24 Sections 1 - 5 25 Sections 8 - 16 26 Sections 21 - 28 27 Sections 33 - 36; 28 (170) Township 13 South, Range 15 East, Fairbanks Meridian 29 Sections 1 - 3 30 Section 4: excluding Tract 15B, EV-2-676, Plat 2001-16, 31 Fairbanks Recording District 01 Section 5: Tracts A-1, B-2, and C-1, ASCS 81-39, Plat 82-94, 02 Fairbanks Recording District, and Tracts C-1B and D, ASLS 03 2004-23, Plat 2007-91, Fairbanks Recording District 04 Section 6: north of the Alaska Highway right of way 05 Section 11: excluding USS 5095A 06 Sections 12 - 13 07 Section 14: excluding USS 5095A, a 1000’ corridor parallel 08 with and adjoining the northerly right of way of the Alaska 09 Highway, and the Alaska Highway right of way 10 Section 21: south and east of the ordinary high water mark of 11 the right bank of the Little Gerstle River 12 Section 22: east of the ordinary high water mark of the right 13 bank of the Little Gerstle River 14 Sections 23 - 24: south of the Alaska Highway right of way 15 Section 27 16 Sections 28 - 29: east of the ordinary high water mark of the 17 right bank of the Little Gerstle River 18 Sections 31 - 32: east of the ordinary high water mark of the 19 right bank of the Little Gerstle River 20 Sections 33 - 34; 21 (171) Township 13 South, Range 16 East, Fairbanks Meridian 22 Sections 1 - 3 23 Section 6 24 Section 7: excluding USS 5417 25 Section 12 26 Sections 16 - 17 27 Section 18: excluding USS 5417 28 Section 19: E1/2 north of the Alaska Highway right of way, 29 NW1/4 north of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 30 of the Tanana River 31 Sections 20 - 21 01 Sections 27 - 28 02 Section 29: east of the Alaska Highway right of way, excluding 03 USS 3335 04 Section 32: east of the Alaska Highway right of way 05 Section 33 - 35; 06 (172) Township 14 South, Range 15 East, Fairbanks Meridian 07 Sections 2 - 3 08 Sections 10 - 12 09 Section 13: excluding ASLS 76-193, Amended Plat 79-58, 10 ASLS 77-173, Plat 80-20, and ASLS 79-38, Plat 82-172, all 11 Fairbanks Recording District 12 Sections 14 - 15 13 Section 24: E1/2; 14 (173) Township 14 South, Range 16 East, Fairbanks Meridian 15 Sections 1 - 4 16 Section 5: Tract B, Plat 83-115, Fairbanks Recording District 17 Section 7 18 Section 8: N1/2 19 Section 9: N1/2 and SE1/4 20 Sections 10 - 12 21 Section 13: excluding Lot 1, USS 4284 22 Section 14: east of the ordinary high water mark of the right 23 bank of Johnson Slough; Tract C, ASCS 83-140, Plat 83- 24 246, Fairbanks Recording District 25 Section 15: excluding USS 2769, E1/2 NE1/4, SW1/4 NE1/4, 26 and Tract I, ASCS 83-140, Plat 83-246, Fairbanks Recording 27 District 28 Section 16: excluding USS 2769 and NW1/4 29 Section 17: S 1/2 30 Section 18: excluding ASLS 76-192, Amended Plat 79-24; 31 ASLS 78-040, Plat 79-259; and ASLS 78-128, Plat 83-161, 01 all Fairbanks Recording District 02 Sections 19 - 21 03 Section 22: excluding ASLS 2005-22, Plat 2016-76, Fairbanks 04 Recording District 05 Sections 23 - 24: excluding Lot 1, USS 4284 06 Section 25 07 Section 26: excluding ASLS 76-74, Plat 79-97; ASLS 80-44, 08 Plat 82-57; ASLS 81-121, Plat 83-176; ASLS 83-93, Plat 83- 09 192; ASLS 91-234, Plat 92-65; and ASLS 98-036, Plat 2000- 10 11, all Fairbanks Recording District 11 Section 27: excluding ASLS 76-74, Plat 79-97; ASLS 76-75, 12 Plat 79-23; ASLS 79-15, Plat 80-17; ASLS 91-234, Plat 92- 13 65; and ASLS 2005-22, Plat 2016-76, all Fairbanks Recording 14 District 15 Sections 28 - 29 16 Section 30: N1/2 and SE1/4 17 Section 32: N1/2 18 Section 33: excluding ASLS 76-75, Plat 79-23, Fairbanks 19 Recording District 20 Section 34: excluding ASLS 73-56, Plat 82-160; and ASLS 76- 21 75, Plat 79-23, Fairbanks Recording District; 22 (174) Township 13 North, Range 11 East, Copper River Meridian 23 Sections 2 - 3 24 Sections 9 - 11 25 Sections 14 - 15; 26 (175) Township 14 North, Range 11 East, Copper River Meridian 27 Section 6 28 Section 8 29 Section 17 30 Section 20: E1/2 31 Section 22 01 Section 26 02 Section 27: excluding ASLS 79-131, Plat 80-74, Fairbanks 03 Recording District 04 Section 34: excluding ASLS 78-21, Plat 79-206; and ASLS 79- 05 131, Plat 80-74, Fairbanks Recording District 06 Section 35; 07 (176) Township 15 North, Range 10 East, Copper River Meridian 08 Section 10: S1/2 09 Section 11: S1/2 10 Sections 12 - 15 11 Section 22: N1/2 12 Section 23: N1/2 13 Sections 24 - 25; 14 (177) Township 15 North, Range 11 East, Copper River Meridian 15 Sections 1 - 3 16 Section 4: excluding ASLS 78-42, Plat 78-123, Fairbanks 17 Recording District 18 Sections 5 - 11 19 Section 15 20 Sections 17 - 19 21 Section 22 22 Sections 30 - 31; 23 (178) Township 16 North, Range 11 East, Copper River Meridian 24 Sections 1 - 3 25 Sections 10 - 15 26 Sections 22 - 25 27 Section 26: excluding F-029021 28 Sections 27 - 36; 29 (179) Township 16 North, Range 12 East, Copper River Meridian 30 Section 1: excluding USS 13841 31 Sections 2 - 12 01 Sections 14 - 16 02 Section 17: excluding USS 3135, USS 10185, USS 11565, and 03 F-030060 04 Section 18: excluding USS 10185, USS 11565, and F-030675 05 Section 19: excluding F-030675 06 Section 20: excluding USS 3135 and F-029021 07 Sections 21 - 22 08 Sections 28 - 32; 09 (180) Township 17 North, Range 11 East, Copper River Meridian 10 Sections 1 - 3 11 Sections 10 - 15; 12 (181) Township 17 North, Range 12 East, Copper River Meridian 13 Section 5: west of the Eagle Trail right of way 14 Section 6: west of the Eagle Trail right of way 15 Section 7 16 Section 8: west of the Eagle Trail right of way 17 Section 9: west of the Eagle Trail right of way 18 Section 13: east of the Tok Cutoff Highway right of way 19 Section 14: east of the Tok Cutoff Highway right of way 20 Section 15: west of the Eagle Trail right of way 21 Section 16: west of the Eagle Trail right of way 22 Sections 17 - 18 23 Section 19: excluding USS 7463 and USS 11209 24 Section 20: excluding USS 7463 25 Section 21 26 Section 22: west of the Eagle Trail right of way 27 Section 23: east of the Tok Cutoff Highway right of way and 28 west of the Eagle Trail right of way 29 Sections 24 - 25 30 Section 26: excluding USS 13416 and USS 13731 31 Sections 27 - 28 01 Section 29: excluding USS 7463 02 Section 30: excluding USS 7463 03 Sections 31 - 34 04 Section 35: excluding USS 13416 and USS 13764 05 Section 36; 06 (182) Township 17 North, Range 13 East, Copper River Meridian 07 Section 2: west of the boundary of USS 2547 08 Section 3: west of the boundary of USS 2547 09 Sections 4 - 9 10 Section 10: west of the boundary of USS 2547 11 Section 15: west of the boundary of USS 2547 12 Section 16: west of the boundary of USS 2547 13 Sections 17 - 19 14 Section 20: west of the boundary of USS 2547 15 Section 21: west of the boundary of USS 2547 16 Section 29: west of the boundary of USS 2547 17 Section 30: west of the boundary of USS 2547 18 Section 31: west of the boundary of USS 2547; 19 (183) Township 18 North, Range 11 East, Copper River Meridian 20 Sections 1 - 2 21 Sections 3 - 4: excluding U.S. Survey 2631 22 USS 11559 (located within Sections 8, 9, 16, and 17) 23 Section 22: excluding USS 2631, USS 13732, and USS 14042 24 Section 23: excluding USS 13712 25 Section 24 - 26 26 Section 27: excluding USS 13732 27 Section 35 28 Section 36: excluding USS 13171; 29 (184) Township 18 North, Range 12 East, Copper River Meridian 30 Sections 3 - 6 31 Section 7: excluding Government Lots 2-4 and the SW1/4 01 SE1/4 02 Sections 8 - 9 03 Section 17: Government Lot 1; 04 (185) Township 18 North, Range 13 East, Copper River Meridian 05 Sections 4 and 5 06 Tract H, as shown on U.S. Rectangular Survey Plat filed 07 January 16, 2015; 08 (186) Township 18 North, Range 14 East, Copper River Meridian 09 Section 6: excluding ASLS 75-121, Plat 79-42, Fairbanks 10 Recording District and ASLS 88-028, Plat 89-52, Fairbanks 11 Recording District; 12 (187) Township 19 North, Range 8 East, Copper River Meridian 13 Section 1: east of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 14 of Tanana River, excluding ASLS 85-262, Plat 89-70; ASLS 15 88-165, Plat 90-65; and ASLS 90-109, Plat 91-59, all 16 Fairbanks Recording District 17 Section 2: east of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 18 of Tanana River, excluding ASLS 88-180, Plat 90-87 and 19 ASLS 90-109, Plat 91-59; both Fairbanks Recording District 20 Section 3: that portion of the NE1/4 NE1/4 east of the Alaska 21 Highway right of way 22 Section 12: east of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 23 of Tanana River, excluding ASLS 85-284, Plat 88-39, 24 Fairbanks Recording District 25 Section 13: east of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 26 of Tanana River, excluding ASLS 85-284, Plat 88-39, 27 Fairbanks Recording District 28 Section 24: east of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 29 of Tanana River, excluding ASLS 88-92, Plat 89-91; and 30 ASLS 88-184, Plat 90-54, both Fairbanks Recording District 01 Section 25: east of the ordinary high water mark of the left bank 02 of Tanana River, excluding ASLS 88-184, Plat 90-54, 03 Fairbanks Recording District; 04 (188) Township 19 North, Range 9 East, Copper River Meridian 05 Sections 1 - 14 06 Section 15: excluding ASLS 86-156, Plat 88-3, Fairbanks 07 Recording District 08 Sections 16 - 21 09 Section 22: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left 10 bank of Tanana River, excluding ASLS 86-156, Plat 88-3; 11 ASLS 90-117, Plat 90-97; ASLS 82-42, Plat 83-111; ASLS 89- 12 188, Plat 91-69; and ASLS 88-182, Plat 90-71, all Fairbanks 13 Recording District 14 Section 23: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left 15 bank of Tanana River, excluding ASLS 82-41, Plat 85-251; 16 and ASLS 85-261, Plat 89-69, both Fairbanks Recording 17 District 18 Section 24: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left 19 bank of Tanana River, excluding ASLS 88-130, Plat 90-52; 20 and ASLS 88-163, Plat 90-63, both Fairbanks Recording 21 District 22 Section 25: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left 23 bank of Tanana River 24 Section 28: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left 25 bank of Tanana River 26 Section 29: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left 27 bank of Tanana River, excluding ASLS 88-181, Plat 91-12, 28 Fairbanks Recording District 29 Section 30: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left 30 bank of Tanana River, excluding ASLS 88-209, Plat 89-80, 31 Fairbanks Recording District 01 Section 31: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left 02 bank of Tanana River 03 Section 32: north of the ordinary high water mark of the left 04 bank of Tanana River; 05 (189) Township 19 North, Range 12 East, Copper River Meridian 06 Sections 1 - 3 07 Section 10 08 Section 11: excluding F-14438 09 Section 12 10 Section 13: excluding F-14471 11 Sections 14 - 15 12 Section 16: E1/2 13 Section 17: S1/2 14 Section 19 15 Section 20: excluding USS 6011 16 Sections 21: excluding USS 14026 17 Sections 22 - 27 18 Sections 28 - 29: excluding USS 11560 19 Sections 30 - 36; 20 (190) Township 19 North, Range 13 East, Copper River Meridian 21 All except the following exclusions: Sections 30 - 32, USS 22 7620, USS 6020, USS 11215, USS 13991, USS13866, USS 23 11242, ASLS 83-80, Plat 84-25; and ASLS 91-05, Plat 92-19, 24 both Fairbanks Recording District; 25 (191) Township 19 North, Range 14 East, Copper River Meridian 26 Sections 1 - 30 27 Section 31: excluding ASLS 75-121, Plat 79-42, Fairbanks 28 Recording District 29 Sections 32 - 33 30 Section 34: excluding ASLS 88-183, Plat 90-73, Fairbanks 31 Recording District 01 Section 35: north of the boundary of USS 2547 02 Section 36; 03 (192) Township 19 North, Range 15 East, Copper River Meridian 04 Sections 16 - 36; 05 (193) Township 20 North, Range 8 East, Copper River Meridian 06 Sections 1 - 2 07 Section 3: east of the Alaska Highway right of way 08 Section 10: east of the Alaska Highway right of way 09 Section 11: east of the Alaska Highway right of way 10 Sections 12 - 13 11 Section 14: east of the Alaska Highway right of way 12 Section 23: east of the Alaska Highway right of way 13 Sections 24 - 25 14 Section 26: east of the Alaska Highway right of way 15 Section 34: east of the Alaska Highway right of way 16 Section 35: east of the Alaska Highway right of way 17 Section 36; 18 (194) Township 20 North, Range 9 East, Copper River Meridian; 19 (195) Township 20 North, Range 10 East, Copper River Meridian 20 Sections 1 - 5 21 Section 6: excluding USS 11562 and USS 6143 22 Section 7: excluding USS 11562 23 Sections 8 - 12 24 Sections 15 - 16 25 Sections 17 - 18: excluding USS 11564 and USS 6032 26 Sections 19 - 21 27 Sections 28 - 33; 28 (196) Township 20 North, Range 11 East, Copper River Meridian 29 Sections 1 - 8 30 Section 9: excluding USS 14503 31 Sections 10 - 15 01 Section 16: excluding USS 14503 02 Sections 17 - 18 03 Sections 20 - 23 04 Sections 28 - 29 05 Section 32 06 Section 33: excluding USS 4377 and USS 6008; 07 (197) Township 20 North, Range 12 East, Copper River Meridian 08 Sections 20 - 29 09 Sections 34 - 36; 10 (198) Township 20 North, Range 13 East, Copper River Meridian 11 Sections 19 - 36; 12 (199) Township 21 North, Range 8 East, Copper River Meridian 13 Sections 1 - 5 14 Sections 8 - 17 15 Sections 21 - 25 16 Sections 26 - 27: excluding USS 3620 17 Section 34: excluding USS 3620 and USS 5622A 18 Section 36; 19 (200) Township 21 North, Range 9 East, Copper River Meridian; 20 (201) Township 21 North, Range 10 East, Copper River Meridian 21 Sections 23 - 26 22 Sections 35 - 36; 23 (202) Township 22 North, Range 5 East, Copper River Meridian 24 Sections 1 - 12 25 Sections 13 - 17: north of the Alaska Highway right of way 26 Section 18: north of the Alaska Highway right of way, 27 excluding Lot 3, USS 4289; 28 (203) Township 22 North, Range 8 East, Copper River Meridian; 29 (204) Township 22 North, Range 9 East, Copper River Meridian; 30 (205) Township 23 North, Range 5 East, Copper River Meridian 31 Sections 1 - 3 01 Sections 10 - 15 02 Sections 21 - 24; 03 (206) Township 23 North, Range 6 East, Copper River Meridian 04 Sections 5 - 7 05 Section 13 06 Sections 18 - 19 07 Sections 24 - 25; 08 (207) Township 23 North, Range 7 East, Copper River Meridian 09 Sections 1 - 30 10 Section 36; 11 (208) Township 23 North, Range 8 East, Copper River Meridian 12 Excluding USS 6144, USS 11561, and USS 6047; 13 (209) Township 24 North, Range 5 East, Copper River Meridian 14 Sections 1 - 5 15 Sections 8 - 17 16 Sections 20 - 29 17 Sections 34 - 36; 18 (210) Township 24 North, Range 7 East, Copper River Meridian; 19 (211) Township 25 North, Range 6 East, Copper River Meridian; 20 (212) Township 25 North, Range 7 East, Copper River Meridian; 21 (213) Township 25 North, Range 8 East, Copper River Meridian 22 Sections 6 - 7 23 Sections 18 - 19 24 Sections 31 - 32; 25 (214) Township 26 North, Range 5 East, Copper River Meridian; 26 Sections 1 - 20 27 Sections 23 - 26 28 Sections 34 - 36; 29 (215) Township 26 North, Range 6 East, Copper River Meridian; 30 (216) Township 26 North, Range 7 East, Copper River Meridian 31 Sections 4 - 8 01 Sections 17 - 18; 02 (217) Township 27 North, Range 6 East, Copper River Meridian 03 Sections 25 - 36; 04 (218) Township 27 North, Range 7 East, Copper River Meridian 05 Sections 15 - 36; 06 (219) Township 28 North, Range 5 East, Copper River Meridian 07 Sections 31 - 35. 08 * Sec. 2. AS 41.17.400 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 09 (f) For the purposes of the descriptions in (d) of this section, "section" or 10 "sections" refers to both surveyed sections and unsurveyed protracted sections. 11 * Sec. 3. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 12 read: 13 TRANSITION: REGULATIONS. The Department of Natural Resources may proceed 14 to adopt regulations necessary to implement the changes made by this Act. The regulations 15 take effect under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), but not before the effective date 16 of the law implemented by the regulations. 17 * Sec. 4. Section 3 of this Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). 18 * Sec. 5. Except as provided in sec. 4 of this Act, this Act takes effect July 1, 2025. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.